Hawaii statutes.
[§244D-11] Tax in addition to other taxes.
The tax imposed by this chapter shall be in addition to any other tax imposed
upon the business of selling liquor or upon any of the transactions, acts, or
activities taxed by this chapter. [L Sp 1984 1st, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next